Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. State Board of Education
and measurable academic student performance standards imposed by law and rule and regulation of the state board of education. Any vacancy in the membership of the task force is to be filled by the appointing authority prescribed under Laws 2003, ch. 208, § 201(b). For purposes of carrying out the requirements of this section and to ensure the assessment system adheres to principles of sound education policy and test measurement, necessary technical, policy and legal experts and representatives from the education community and federal and state governmental agencies are to be assembled on behalf of the task force and the state superintendent.

Laws 2004, ch. 109, § 3, directs the statewide task force and the state superintendent to establish necessary mechanisms and processes to support the transition from the statewide student assessment existing on the effective date of the act to the student assessment system established in accordance with W.S. 21-2-304(a)(v) as amended by section 1 of the act. The pilot test of the assessment is to be administered during the 2004-2005 school year to enable full implementation of the statewide assessment in school year 2005-2006. The state superintendent is to develop and, following review by the task force, issue a request for proposal (RFP) for statewide student assessment development in sufficient time for pilot testing during the 2004-2005 school year. If a proposal meets the specifications and requirements and is approved by the task force, the state superintendent is to submit the proposal to the state board for review and accept the proposal and enter into contract to implement the proposal subject to funds available within the state superintendent's budget to implement its provision. On or before November 1, 2004, the state superintendent and the task force are to report to the state board of education, the management council and the joint education interim committee on recommendations developed under this section, clearly specifying progress on development of the statewide assessment system, defining the assessment system and reporting on the development and administration of a pilot test for the assessment.

Laws 2004, ch. 109, § 4, directs the state superintendent and the statewide task force, for school year 2004-2005 and prior to implementation of recommendations developed under this section, to establish a transitional plan to provide a temporary system of rewards and sanctions for all schools and school districts. The statewide task force and the state superintendent are to report to the state board of education, the management council and the joint education interim committee on recommendations for the establishment of a permanent process providing consequences for school accountability as prescribed under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(vi), as amended by section 1 of the act. In addition, the task force and the state superintendent are to develop recommendations on the range of rewards for schools meeting adequate yearly progress measures and other criteria under the statewide accountability system established under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(vi), as amended by section 1 of the act.

Laws 2004, ch. 109, § 6(b) makes §§ 2 – 5 effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2004.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 109, § 5, appropriates $ 300,000 from funds made available to the state under the federal No Child Left Behind Act of 2001 to fund the expenses associated with activities assigned to the statewide task force under section 2 of the act, including necessary consulting expertise to the task force. The department of education, with the assistance of the legislative service office, is to provide necessary staff support for the statewide task force.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Nondelegable duty. —

The state board of education could not delegate to the state director of vocational education the authority to determine whether the board should continue the program of war production training. State ex rel. R. R. Crow & Co. v. Copenhaver, 64 Wyo. 1, 184 P.2d 594,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1947).

Applicability of rules to teachers and administrators. —

Where reason for rule ceases, rule itself ceases, and that axiom applies in determining the applicability of rules of the state board of education to teachers and school superintendents. State ex rel. Pape v. Hockett, 61 Wyo. 145, 156 P.2d 299,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1945).

Rule of the state board of education whereby substitute teachers may keep certificates in force by directed reading and registering certificates does not establish an exclusive method, and approval by educational authorities as to work done is sufficient. State ex rel. Pape v. Hockett, 61 Wyo. 145, 156 P.2d 299,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1945).

Person with education much greater than that of average county superintendent is not disqualified from office for mere failure to comply with purely directory rules of state board of education. State ex rel. Pape v. Hockett, 61 Wyo. 145, 156 P.2d 299,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1945).

Regulation of the state board of education that the standard administrative certificate should be considered as a first class certificate required of county superintendents did not bar payment of compensation to county superintendent who filed an elementary life certificate with board of county commissioners, since the regulation did not state that no other certificate could be considered as first class. State ex rel. Lynch v. Board of County Comm'rs, 75 Wyo. 435, 296 P.2d 986,

1956 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1956).

Effect of excess qualifications. —

Qualifications higher than those required by board for superintendents should not as matter of law be held to disqualify person possessing such higher qualification for such position. State ex rel. Pape v. Hockett, 61 Wyo. 145, 156 P.2d 299,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1945).

Necessity for certificate. —

A teacher whose certificate has expired and who has failed to obtain renewal cannot recover either damages or salary for cancellation of her contract and discharge where statute clearly makes certificate to teach sole evidence of qualification. Seamonds v. School
Dist. No. 14,
Seamonds v. School Dist., 51 Wyo. 477, 68 P.2d 149,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 1937) (see also
??21-7-303).

Expert testimony as to rank of certificates. —

The relative rank of teachers' certificates is not a matter of common knowledge, and is properly the subject of scientific inquiry. State ex rel. Pape v. Hockett, 61 Wyo. 145, 156 P.2d 299,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1945).

New original certificate. —

Teacher's certificate which purports to be a duplicate of one previously issued, and dated with date of previous certificate but signed by present superintendent of public instruction, is neither a duplicate nor a certified copy but must necessarily be an original certificate, valid, at least, as of the time when it was actually issued. State ex rel. Pape v. Hockett, 61 Wyo. 145, 156 P.2d 299,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1945).

Provisional certificate. —

Issuance of provisional first class rural administrative certificate was authorized despite lack of evidence that recipient had been in educational work since 1931, where a board rule suggests issuance is to be based on the thought that the person should be in fact qualified or in comparatively short time will be qualified. State ex rel. Pape v. Hockett, 61 Wyo. 145, 156 P.2d 299,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1945).

Board has discretion to determine what constitutes engaging in education. —

To be “engaged” in educational work does not mean that the person shall be regularly or constantly occupied, but amount of such work is in discretion of the board of education with which court is not concerned. State ex rel. Pape v. Hockett, 61 Wyo. 145, 156 P.2d 299,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1945).

Substitute teaching keeps certificate in force. —

Substitute teaching whereby no period of four years elapsed without some teaching or educational work keeps teacher's certificate in force. State ex rel. Pape v. Hockett, 61 Wyo. 145, 156 P.2d 299,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1945).

School district is not authorized to adopt four-day school week,

resulting in a 144-day school year. Johnston v. Board of Trustees, 661 P.2d 1045,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1983).

Proper approval of vouchers. —

Where vouchers were not approved by the president and secretary of the board of education or by either of them but by only a member of the board and the state director of vocational education, the auditor could rightfully refuse to approve the vouchers or to issue warrants for their payment. State ex rel. R. R. Crow & Co. v. Copenhaver, 64 Wyo. 1, 184 P.2d 594,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1947).

Applied

in

Spurlock v. Bd. of Trustees, 699 P.2d 270,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 478

(Wyo. 1985).

Quoted

in

Campbell County Sch. Dist. v. State, 907 P.2d 1238,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 203

(Wyo. 1995).

Cited

in

Natrona County Sch. Dist. No. 1 v. Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).

Law Reviews. —

For Article, “Teacher Tenure Reform in Wyoming: Bad Teachers Left Behind”, see15 Wyo. L. Rev. 45 (2015).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of local or state denial of public school courses or activities to private or parochial school students, 43 ALR4th 776.

Validity and construction of statutes, ordinances or regulations requiring competency tests of school teachers, 64 ALR4th 642.